Wisconsin, session 2025, SB313.
do enact as follows:SB313,11Section 1. 48.38 (5) (dm) of the statutes is created to read:SB313,2,9248.38 (5) (dm) The agency that prepared the permanency plan may provide a 3copy of the permanency plan and any written comments submitted under par. (bm) 41. to the out-of-home care provider of the child. A permanency plan provided to an 5out-of-home care provider of the child under this paragraph shall be redacted to 6protect information that is required to remain confidential under ss. 48.396 (1) and 7(2), 48.57 (3p) (i), 48.685 (2) (c) 1., 48.686 (4s) (m), 48.981 (7), 49.83, 51.30 (4), 8118.125 (2), 146.82 (1), and 938.396 (1) and (2) or that is required to remain 9confidential under federal law.SB313,210Section 2. 48.38 (5m) (dm) of the statutes is created to read:SB313,3,31148.38 (5m) (dm) The agency that prepared the permanency plan may provide 12a copy of the permanency plan and any written comments submitted under par. (c) 131. to the out-of-home care provider of the child. A permanency plan provided to an 14out-of-home care provider of the child under this paragraph shall be redacted to 15protect information that is required to remain confidential under ss. 48.396 (1) and 1(2), 48.57 (3p) (i), 48.685 (2) (c) 1., 48.686 (4s) (m), 48.981 (7), 49.83, 51.30 (4), 2118.125 (2), 146.82 (1), and 938.396 (1) and (2) or that is required to remain 3confidential under federal law.SB313,34Section 3. 48.78 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB313,3,10548.78 (2) (a) No agency may make available for inspection or disclose the 6contents of any record kept or information received about an individual who is or 7was in its care or legal custody, except as provided under sub. (2m) or s. 48.371, 848.38 (5) (b) or, (d), or (dm) or (5m) (d) or (dm), 48.396 (3) (bm) or (c) 1r., 48.432, 948.433, 48.48 (17) (bm), 48.57 (2m), 48.66 (6), 48.93, 48.981 (7), 938.396 (2m) (c) 1r., 10938.51, or 938.78 or by order of the court.SB313,411Section 4. 938.38 (5) (dm) of the statutes is created to read:SB313,3,1912938.38 (5) (dm) The agency that prepared the permanency plan may provide 13a copy of the permanency plan and any written comments submitted under par. 14(bm) 1. to the out-of-home care provider of the child. A permanency plan provided 15to an out-of-home care provider of the child under this paragraph shall be redacted 16to protect information that is required to remain confidential under ss. 48.396 (1) 17and (2), 48.57 (3p) (i), 48.685 (2) (c) 1., 48.686 (4s) (m), 48.981 (7), 49.83, 51.30 (4), 18118.125 (2), 146.82 (1), and 938.396 (1) and (2) or that is required to remain 19confidential under federal law.SB313,520Section 5. 938.38 (5m) (dm) of the statutes is created to read:SB313,4,521938.38 (5m) (dm) The agency that prepared the permanency plan may 22provide a copy of the permanency plan and any written comments submitted under 23par. (c) 1. to the out-of-home care provider of the child. A permanency plan provided 1to an out-of-home care provider of the child under this paragraph shall be redacted 2to protect information that is required to remain confidential under ss. 48.396 (1) 3and (2), 48.57 (3p) (i), 48.685 (2) (c) 1., 48.686 (4s) (m), 48.981 (7), 49.83, 51.30 (4), 4118.125 (2), 146.82 (1), and 938.396 (1) and (2) or that is required to remain 5confidential under federal law.SB313,66Section 6. 938.78 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB313,4,117938.78 (2) (a) No agency may make available for inspection or disclose the 8contents of any record kept or information received about an individual who is or 9was in its care or legal custody, except as provided under sub. (2m) or (3) or s. 48.396 10(3) (bm) or (c) 1r., 938.371, 938.38 (5) (b) or, (d), or (dm) or (5m) (d) or (dm), 938.396 11(2m) (c) 1r., 938.51, or 938.57 (2m) or by order of the court.SB313,712Section 7. Initial applicability.SB313,4,1513(1) Permanency plan to an out-of-home care provider. This act first 14applies to a permanency review or permanency hearing commencing on the 30th 15day after the effective date of this subsection.SB313,4,1616